Massachusetts, session 194th, H2929.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 325, after the words “assistant deputy
superintendent” the following words:- correctional program officer A/B, C, D, or equivalent or
successive titles who have been employed in such capacities or other Group 4 titles for 10 years
or more
of 1